Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1298
Salvage motorboat; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who knowingly transfers a wrecked, damaged, or destroyed motorboat in violation of sections 37-1293 to 37-1296 is guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 11.